District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.08

Organization and operation of the Board.

(a)

The Board shall be organized, shall operate, and may establish committees under such rules and bylaws as the Board establishes.

(b)

The Board shall meet at least twice a year and at the call of the Commissioner.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 108, 48 DCR 3244